Hawaii statutes.
§431:9-207 Scope of examination (a)
Each examination shall be as the commissioner prescribes and shall be of
reasonably sufficient scope to test the applicant's knowledge relative to the
classes of insurance which may be dealt with under the license applied for, and
of the duties and responsibilities of, and the laws of this State applicable
to, such licensee.

(b) The commissioner is required to prepare
and make available to insurers and applicants a printed manual specifying in
general terms the subjects which may be covered in any examination for a
particular license. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2001, c 216, §10]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next